Indiana, session 2026, SB217.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-53.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]:
Chapter 53.5. Maximum Increase in Homestead Property Tax
Liability
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to taxes first due and payable after
December 31, 2026.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "homestead" has the meaning set
forth in IC 6-1.1-12-37.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "property tax liability" means
liability for the tax imposed on homestead property under this
article determined after application of all credits and deductions
under this article, but does not include any interest or penalty
imposed under this article.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "qualified individual" means an
individual who:
(1) has received a standard homestead deduction granted
2026 IN 217—LS 6926/DI 120


under IC 6-1.1-12-37 for the individual's homestead property
in the immediately preceding calendar year (or was married
at the time of death to a deceased spouse who qualified for a
standard homestead deduction granted under IC 6-1.1-12-37
for the individual's homestead property in the immediately
preceding calendar year); and
(2) is receiving a standard homestead deduction granted
under IC 6-1.1-12-37 for the same homestead property in the
current calendar year.
Sec. 5. A credit shall be applied against a qualified individual's
homestead property tax liability as set forth in this chapter. The
amount of the credit is equal to the greater of zero (0) or the result
of:
(1) the property tax liability first due and payable on the
qualified individual's homestead property for the calendar
year (excluding any property tax liability imposed in a voter
approved referendum levy); minus
(2) the result of:
(A) the property tax liability first due and payable on the
qualified individual's homestead property for the
immediately preceding year after the application of the
credit granted under this section for that year (excluding
any property tax liability imposed in a voter approved
referendum levy); multiplied by
(B) one and four-hundredths (1.04).
However, the credit provided by this chapter shall not apply to any
portion of property tax liability imposed on a qualified individual's
homestead property that is used for trade or business purposes in
connection with the production of income. In addition, the credit
does not affect the allocation of taxes to a referendum fund.
Sec. 6. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), the amount of
property tax liability determined under this chapter is the
maximum property tax liability to which homestead property is
subject for the applicable calendar year.
(b) If a physical change to homestead property results in an
increased assessment of the homestead property for an assessment
date after December 31, 2026, for which property tax liability is
imposed, the property tax liability of a person for property taxes
first due and payable for that assessment date with respect to the
homestead property is the sum of the:
(1) amount of the person's property tax liability attributable
to the homestead property as determined under this chapter
2026 IN 217—LS 6926/DI 120


for the calendar year; plus
(2) amount of the person's property tax liability that is
directly attributable to the physical change in the homestead
property.
Sec. 7. A person is not required to file an application for the
credit under this chapter. The county auditor shall:
(1) identify the homestead property in the county eligible for
the credit under this chapter; and
(2) apply the credit under this chapter to homestead property
tax liability on the identified property.
SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 217—LS 6926/DI 120